Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2326
Damage; duty of excavator.

If any underground facility is damaged, dislocated, or disturbed before or during excavation, the excavator shall immediately notify the center. An excavator shall not conceal or attempt to conceal damage, dislocation, or disturbance of an underground facility and shall not repair or attempt to repair the underground facility unless authorized by the operator of the underground facility.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 26.